Hawaii statutes.
§206E-202 District established;
boundaries. (a)
The Heeia community development district is hereby established. The district
shall include that area within the boundaries described as follows: the
southern boundary begins at the southern property line of tax map key number
(1) 4-6-16:001 and runs west to Kahekili Highway and east to Kamehameha Highway.
The northern boundary begins at the northern property line of tax map key
number (1) 4-6-16:001 and runs west to Kahekili Highway and east to Kamehameha Highway.
The tax map key numbers are (1) 4-6-16:001 and (1) 4-6-16:002 (owned by the
authority), and (1) 4‑6‑16:004, :011, :012, and :017 (owned by
various owners of kuleana parcels).

(b) The authority
shall serve as the local redevelopment authority of the district to facilitate
culturally appropriate agriculture, education, and natural-resource restoration
and management of the Heeia wetlands, in alignment with the Honolulu board of
water supply's most current "Koolau Poko Watershed Management Plan"
and the city and county of Honolulu's most current "Koolaupoko Sustainable
Communities Plan". In addition to any other of its duties under this
chapter, the authority shall:

(1) Consult with the following persons and entities:

(A) Recorded landowners in the district;

(B) Recorded landowners in section 6 of zone 4 of the
first tax map key division;

(C) Koolaupoko Hawaiian Civic Club;

(D) Kailua neighborhood board;

(E) Kahaluu neighborhood board; and

(F) Kaneohe neighborhood board,

to implement activities related to and supportive of cultural practices,
agriculture, education, and natural-resource restoration and management;

(2) Assist land users to manage their properties and implement activities
related to and supportive of cultural practices, agriculture, education, and
natural-resource restoration and management;

(3) Work with federal, state, county, and other agencies to ensure that
infrastructural support is provided for the district;

(4) Develop the infrastructure necessary to support the implementation of the
Heeia community development district master plan; and

(5) Provide, to the extent feasible, maximum opportunity for the restoration
and implementation of sustainable, culturally appropriate, biologically
responsible, or agriculturally beneficial enterprises. [L 2011, c 210, pt of §2; am L 2012, c 323, §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next